Hawaii statutes.
§832-20 Guilt or innocence of accused, when
inquired into. The guilt or innocence of the accused as to the crime of
which the accused is charged may not be inquired into by the governor or in any
proceeding after the demand for extradition accompanied by a charge of crime in
legal form as above provided has been presented to the governor, except as it
may be involved in identifying the person held as the person charged with the
crime. [L 1941, c 99, §20; RL 1945, §10650; RL 1955, §250-20; HRS §713-20; ren
L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next